src/derivation/crk-drv.lexc
@P.infl.NONTERM@piýêsiw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@piýêsiw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@piń-:@P.infl.NONTERM@piń I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@poht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@poht I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@posakâhkê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@posakâhkê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@posisk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@posisk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@post-:@P.infl.NONTERM@post I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@posâkan-:@P.infl.NA-1@posâkan I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@posâkan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@posâkan I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@poýak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@poýak I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pwâhp-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pwâhp I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pwâka-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pwâka I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pwâkam-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pwâkam I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pwâkamo-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pwâkamo I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@pwâkamo-:@P.infl.VAI-v@pwâkamo I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@pwâkomo-:@P.infl.VAI-v@pwâkomo I2M ;
@P.infl.IPV@pwâna-:@P.infl.IPV@pwâna I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pwâstawâc:@P.infl.IPC@pwâstawâc I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pwâstâw:@P.infl.IPC@pwâstâw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pwâstâw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pwâstâw I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@pwât-:@P.infl.NA-1@pwât I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-4@pwât-:@P.infl.NA-4@pwât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pwât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pwât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pwâtaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pwâtaw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pwâw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pwâw I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@pwêkito-:@P.infl.VAI-v@pwêkito I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pwêýak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pwêýak I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhk I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@pâhkahahkwân-:@P.infl.NA-1@pâhkahahkwân I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhkahkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhkahkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@pâhkahâhkwân-:@P.infl.NA-1@pâhkahâhkwân I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhkahâhkwân-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhkahâhkwân I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhp-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhp I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhpaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhpaw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhpi-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhpi I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@pâhpâstêw-:@P.infl.NA-2@pâhpâstêw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhpâstêw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhpâstêw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhpâwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâhpâwê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâkaha-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâkaha I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâkiýihkwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâkiýihkwê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâkâh-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâkâh I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâmoyês:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâmoyês I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâmwayês:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâmwayês I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pân-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pân I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pânahkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pânahkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâpakw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâpakw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâpaýi-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâpaýi I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâs-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâs I2M ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@pâs-:@P.infl.VTI-1@pâs I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâsikwât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâsikwât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâsit-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâsit I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâsk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâsk I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pâskat-:@P.infl.IPC@pâskat I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâskat-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâskat I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâskatayê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâskatayê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâst-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâst I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâstâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâstâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâstât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâstât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâstê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâstê I2M ;
@P.infl.VII-v@pâstê-:@P.infl.VII-v@pâstê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâsw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâsw I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-3@pâsw-:@P.infl.VTA-3@pâsw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pâtimâ:@P.infl.IPC@pâtimâ I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pâtos-:@P.infl.IPC@pâtos I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâtos-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâtos I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâwan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâwan I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@pâwanî-:@P.infl.VAI-v@pâwanî I2M ;
@P.infl.INM@pâwistikw-:@P.infl.INM@pâwistikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-3@pâwistikw-:@P.infl.NI-3@pâwistikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pâwistikw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pâwistikw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPV@pê-:@P.infl.IPV@pê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pêh-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pêh I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@pêh-:@P.infl.VTA-1@pêh I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pêhk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pêhk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pêhkiht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pêhkiht I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pêhpêk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pêhpêk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pêkatê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pêkatê I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@pêkatê-:@P.infl.VAI-v@pêkatê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pêkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pêkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pêpiy-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pêpiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pês-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pês I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@pêsiskâ-:@P.infl.VAI-v@pêsiskâ I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-2@pêsiw-:@P.infl.VTA-2@pêsiw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pêskis:@P.infl.IPC@pêskis I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pêsw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pêsw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pêt-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pêt I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pêyak:@P.infl.IPC@pêyak I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pêyak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pêyak I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pêyakw-:@P.infl.IPC@pêyakw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pêyakw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pêyakw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pêyâhtak-:@P.infl.IPC@pêyâhtak I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pêyâhtak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pêyâhtak I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pêyâhtik-:@P.infl.IPC@pêyâhtik I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîcit-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîcit I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhawaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhawaw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhc-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhc I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhpîk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhpîk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîht I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pîhtaw:@P.infl.IPC@pîhtaw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhtaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhtaw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPV@pîhtawê-:@P.infl.IPV@pîhtawê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhtawê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhtawê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhtw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhtw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhtwâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîhtwâ I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@pîhtwâ-:@P.infl.VAI-v@pîhtwâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîkanw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîkanw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîkin-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîkin I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîkisk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîkisk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîkiskw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîkiskw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîkiskwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîkiskwê I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@pîkiskwê-:@P.infl.VAI-v@pîkiskwê I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-1@pîkiskwêwin-:@P.infl.NI-1@pîkiskwêwin I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîkisê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîkisê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîm-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîm I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîmik-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîmik I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîminâhkwân-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîminâhkwân I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîmiskwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîmiskwê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîmit-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîmit I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîs-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîs I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîsawâcâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîsawâcâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîsim-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîsim I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pîsimw-:@P.infl.IPC@pîsimw I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@pîsimw-:@P.infl.NA-3@pîsimw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîsimw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîsimw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîsk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîsk I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-4w@pîskw-:@P.infl.NA-4w@pîskw I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-2@pîstêw-:@P.infl.NI-2@pîstêw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîstêw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîstêw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîswê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîswê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîsâkamâsk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîsâkamâsk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîsâkan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîsâkan I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîsâkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîsâkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîtat-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîtat I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pîtos:@P.infl.IPC@pîtos I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pîtos-:@P.infl.IPC@pîtos I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîtos-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîtos I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîtot-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîtot I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîw I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@pîway-:@P.infl.NA-2@pîway I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-2@pîway-:@P.infl.NI-2@pîway I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîway-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîway I2M ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@pîwit-:@P.infl.VTI-1@pîwit I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pîwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pîwê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pômê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pômê I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@pômê-:@P.infl.VAI-v@pômê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pôn-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pôn I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@pôn-:@P.infl.VTA-1@pôn I2M ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@pôn-:@P.infl.VTI-1@pôn I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pônakisk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pônakisk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pônê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pônê I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@pônîw-:@P.infl.NA-2@pônîw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pôs-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pôs I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@pôsiy-:@P.infl.NA-2@pôsiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pôsiy-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pôsiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pôskw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pôskw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pôsâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pôsâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@pôsîw-:@P.infl.NA-2@pôsîw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pôt-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pôt I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@pôti:@P.infl.IPC@pôti I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@pôtâw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@pôtâw I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@pôyo-:@P.infl.VAI-v@pôyo I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sahkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sahkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sak I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sakatê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sakatê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sakiniskên-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sakiniskên I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sakw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sakw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sakâp-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sakâp I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sakâw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sakâw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sam-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sam I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@samak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@samak I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@samask-:@P.infl.NONTERM@samask I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@samat-:@P.infl.NONTERM@samat I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sasahkê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sasahkê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sasawâp-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sasawâp I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sask-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sask I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@saskah-:@P.infl.NONTERM@saskah I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@saskaho-:@P.infl.NONTERM@saskaho I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@saskat-:@P.infl.NONTERM@saskat I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sast-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sast I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sasâkis-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sasâkis I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sasâkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sasâkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sasîht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sasîht I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sasîp-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sasîp I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@saw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@saw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sawânak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sawânak I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sawê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sawê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sihk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sihk I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@sihkihp-:@P.infl.NA-1@sihkihp I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sihkihp-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sihkihp I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@sihkos-:@P.infl.NA-1@sihkos I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sihkos-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sihkos I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@sihkosiw:@P.infl.NA-2@sihkosiw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sihkosiw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sihkosiw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sihkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sihkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@siht-:@P.infl.NA-1@siht I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-4@siht-:@P.infl.NA-4@siht I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@siht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@siht I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-3@sihtakw-:@P.infl.NI-3@sihtakw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sik-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sik I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sikat-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sikat I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sikw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sikwat-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sikwat I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sikwatak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sikwatak I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sikwâwak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sikwâwak I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@sikâkw-:@P.infl.NA-3@sikâkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sikâkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sikâkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sim-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sim I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@simat-:@P.infl.NONTERM@simat I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@simâkan:@P.infl.NA-1@simâkan I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@simâkan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@simâkan I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sinikohk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sinikohk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sinikoht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sinikoht I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sinikw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sinikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sip-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sip I2M ;
@P.infl.IPV@sipwê-:@P.infl.IPV@sipwê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sipwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sipwê I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@sisikot-:@P.infl.IPC@sisikot I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sisikot-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sisikot I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sisikw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sisikw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@sisikwat-:@P.infl.IPC@sisikwat I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sisikwat-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sisikwat I2M ;
@P.infl.IPV@sisiwê-:@P.infl.IPV@sisiwê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sisiwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sisiwê I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@sisonê:@P.infl.IPC@sisonê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sisonê:@P.infl.NONTERM@sisonê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sisop-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sisop I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sisopê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sisopê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sisopêk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sisopêk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sisow-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sisow I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@sisw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sisw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@siswê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@siswê I2M ;
